Wyoming, session 2026, HB0015.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-12-801 and 40-12-802 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 8
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
RIGHT TO REPAIR DIGITAL ELECTRONIC EQUIPMENT

40-12-801. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Authorized repair provider" means:

(A) A person who has an agreement with an
original equipment manufacturer where:

(I) The original equipment
manufacturer grants the person a license to use a trade
name, service mark or other proprietary identifier for
purposes of providing or offering the services of
diagnosing, maintaining or repairing digital electronic
equipment; or

(II) The person provides or offers the
services of diagnosing, maintaining or repairing digital
electronic equipment on behalf of an original equipment
manufacturer.

HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
(B) An original equipment manufacturer who
provides or offers the services of diagnosing, maintaining
or repairing digital electronic equipment that the original
equipment manufacturer makes or sells.

(ii) "Digital electronic equipment" means a
product that functions in whole or in part on the basis of
digital electronics that are embedded within or attached to
the product;

(iii) "Documentation" means any manual, diagram,
reporting output, service code description, schematic
diagram, security code or password or other guidance or
information that enables a person to diagnose, maintain or
repair digital electronic equipment;

(iv) "Embedded software" means any programmable
software delivered with or loaded onto digital electronic
equipment and all relevant patches and fixes made by an
original equipment manufacturer for purposes of diagnosing,
maintaining or repairing the digital electronic equipment.
"Embedded software" includes a basic internal operating
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
system, a machine code, an assembly code, a root code, a
microcode and any other similar components;

(v) "Fair and reasonable terms" means:

(A) With respect to obtaining
documentation, parts, embedded software or tools for
digital electronic equipment, terms that are equivalent to
the most favorable terms that an original equipment
manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider and
charges that are not more than the original equipment
manufacturer's suggested retail price calculated by using
the net charge less any discounts, rebates or other
incentive programs;

(B) With respect to documentation that an
original equipment manufacturer provides, documentation,
including any relevant updates, provided at no charge
except that the original equipment manufacturer may charge
a fee for a copy of the documentation if the amount of the
fee covers only the manufacturer's actual costs to prepare
and send the copy of the documentation;

HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
(C) With respect to tools that an original
equipment manufacturer provides, tools provided:

(I) At no charge except that the
original equipment manufacturer may charge a fee for a tool
if the amount of the fee covers only the manufacturer's
actual costs to prepare and send the tool;

(II) Without requiring authorization
or otherwise imposing impediments to access or use the
tools to diagnose, maintain or repair digital electronic
equipment; and

(III) In a manner that does not impair
the efficient and cost-effective performance of any
diagnosis, maintenance or repair of the digital electronic
equipment.

(D) With respect to parts that an original
equipment manufacturer makes available either directly or
indirectly through an authorized repair provider, terms
that:

HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
(I) Do not impose a substantial
condition, obligation or restriction that is not reasonably
necessary to enable the diagnosis, maintenance or repair of
digital electronic equipment;

(II) Do not require the purchase of a
minimum or maximum quantity of parts; and

(III) Do not condition access to parts
on any additional agreement other than a purchase order.

(vi) "Independent repair provider" means a
person who is not affiliated with an original equipment
manufacturer or an authorized repair provider and who is
engaged in the services of diagnosing, maintaining or
repairing digital electronic equipment;

(vii) "Original equipment manufacturer" means a
person that is primarily engaged in selling new digital
electronic equipment;

HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
(viii) "Owner" means a person that owns digital
electronic equipment that the person purchased or used in
this state;

(ix) "Part" means any replacement part, either
new or used, made available or used by an original
equipment manufacturer or authorized repair provider for
purposes of maintaining or repairing digital electronic
equipment;

(x) "Parts pairing" means an original equipment
manufacturer's practice of using software to identify
component parts through a unique identifier;

(xi) "Tools" means any software, hardware
implement or other apparatus used for diagnosis,
maintenance or repair of digital electronic equipment
including software or other mechanisms that provide
programs or pairs a new part, calibrates functionality or
performs any other function required to return the digital
electronic equipment or part to a fully functional
condition;

HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
(xii) "Trade secret" means as defined in W.S.
40-24-101(a)(iv).

40-12-802. Right to repair digital electronic
equipment.

(a) For digital electronic equipment manufactured for
the first time and first sold or used in this state on or
after July 1, 2026, an original equipment manufacturer
shall, with fair and reasonable terms, make available to an
independent repair provider and owner any documentation,
embedded software, parts and tools required for diagnosing,
maintaining or repairing the digital electronic equipment
or any part of the digital electronic equipment.

(b) For digital electronic equipment manufactured for
the first time and first sold or used in this state on or
after July 1, 2026, no original equipment manufacturer
shall use parts pairing or any other mechanism to:

(i) Prevent or inhibit an independent repair
provider or owner from installing or enabling a function of
an otherwise functional part of digital electronic
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
equipment including a replacement part that an original
equipment manufacturer has not approved;

(ii) Inhibit or reduce the functionality of any
part of digital electronic equipment where the replacement
by an independent repair provider or owner would cause the
device to operate with reduced functionality or
performance;

(iii) Create false, misleading or deceptive
alerts or warnings about parts of digital electronic
equipment;

(iv) Charge additional fees or increase prices
for future repairs of digital electronic equipment; or

(v) Limit who can purchase parts or perform
repair services for digital electronic equipment.

(c) For digital electronic equipment manufactured for
the first time and first sold or used in this state on or
after July 1, 2026 that contains an electronic security
lock or other security related function, an original
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
equipment manufacturer shall, with fair and reasonable
terms, make available to an owner any documentation,
embedded software, parts or tools required to disable and
reset the lock or function while diagnosing, maintaining or
repairing the digital electronic equipment. An original
equipment manufacturer may make the documentation, embedded
software, parts or tools available to an independent repair
provider or owner through appropriate secure release
systems.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

(i) Require an original equipment manufacturer
to divulge a trade secret except an original equipment
manufacturer shall not refuse to make available, with fair
and reasonable terms, any documentation, embedded software,
part or tools necessary to diagnose, maintain or repair
digital electronic equipment as required by this section
and may redact trade secrets from any documentation or
tools provided to an independent repair provider or owner;

(ii) Abrogate, interfere with, contradict or
alter the terms of any contract or agreement executed and
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
in force between an authorized repair provider and an
original equipment manufacturer including, but not limited
to, terms related to the performance or provision of
warranty or recall repair work by an authorized repair
provider on behalf of an original equipment manufacturer
pursuant to a contract or agreement, except that any
provision in a contract or agreement purporting to waive,
avoid, restrict or limit an original equipment
manufacturer's compliance with this section shall be void;

(iii) Impose any new type of liability upon an
original equipment manufacturer for any bodily injury or
damage to digital electronic equipment that an independent
repair provider or owner causes while diagnosing,
maintaining or repairing the digital electronic equipment
using documentation, embedded software, parts or tools that
the original equipment manufacturer made available, with
fair and reasonable terms, to an authorized service
provider, an independent repair provider or an owner before
the date of the diagnosis, maintenance or repair;

(iv) Require an original equipment manufacturer
to make available documentation, embedded software, parts,
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
tools or other devices or implements that would disable or
override, without an owner's authorization, anti-theft
security measures that the owner sets for digital
electronic equipment;

(v) Require an original equipment manufacturer
to provide to an independent repair provider or owner any
part that the original equipment manufacturer no longer
makes or no longer provides to authorized service
providers.

(e) This section shall not apply to:

(i) A manufacturer, distributor, importer or
dealer that is engaged in the business of manufacturing or
assembling new motor vehicles as defined by W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xv) or in the business of selling or leasing
new motor vehicles and offering the services of diagnosing,
maintaining or repairing motor vehicles or motor vehicle
engines under the terms of a franchise agreement or to the
person's products or services;

HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
(ii) A product, service or equipment that has
never been made available for retail sale to a consumer;

(iii) A medical device as defined by 21 U.S.C. §
321(h);

(iv) A product, service or equipment that
provides heat, ventilation or air conditioning or recharges
refrigerant gases;

(v) A product, service or equipment that is a
system, mechanism or series of mechanisms that generates,
stores or combines generation and storage of electrical
energy from solar radiation;

(vi) A video game console;

(vii) A product, service or equipment that is a
system that stores electrical energy for a period of time
and transmits the energy after storage that is
interconnected with a transmission or distribution system
and that is approved by an electric utility or located on a
customer's side of an electric utility meter in accordance
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
with an applicable utility tariff or interconnection
agreement;

(viii) A manufacturer, distributor, importer or
dealer of industrial equipment, utility equipment,
construction equipment, compact construction equipment,
road-building equipment, mining equipment, farming
equipment including farm and utility tractors, farm
implements and farm machinery, forestry equipment, turf,
yard and garden equipment and outdoor power equipment;

(ix) Electric toothbrushes;

(x) A manufacturer, distributor, importer or
dealer of any off-road recreational vehicle as defined by
W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K), any multipurpose vehicle as
defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M), marine vehicle,
all-terrain sports vehicle and racing vehicle;

(xi) A manufacturer, distributor, importer or
dealer of any power tools, stand-alone or integrated
stationary or mobile combustion engines and power sources
HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
including generator sets, electric batteries and fuel cell
power.

(f) Except for the rights extended to an owner by
this article, a memorandum of understanding shall govern an
original equipment manufacturer's duties and obligations to
an owner if the memorandum of understanding would otherwise
bind the owner to the terms of the memorandum of
understanding.

(g) A person who violates subsections (a) through (c)
of this section commits an unlawful deceptive trade
practice under W.S. 40-12-105.

(h) This article shall be repealed on the date that
the governor, on advice of the attorney general, certifies
to the secretary of state that the United States congress
enacted federal legislation establishing a right to repair
digital electronic equipment.

(j) To the extent a provision of this article
conflicts with federal law, federal law shall control.

HB0015

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0060
Section 2. W.S. 40-12-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xviii) is amended to read:

40-12-105. Unlawful practices.

(a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice
unlawful under this act when, in the course of his business
and in connection with a consumer transaction, he
knowingly:

(xviii) Violates W.S. 40-12-802.

Section 3. This act shall only apply to digital
electronic equipment manufactured, sold or used in Wyoming
on or after July 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0015